Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 6
CHANGE OF VENUE AND
DISQUALIFICATION OF JUDGE

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1972. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note before the article 1 heading.

Section

PART 1 CHANGE OF VENUE

PART 2 DISQUALIFICATION OF JUDGE